Wisconsin, session 2025, AB221.
do enact as follows:AB221,1Section 1. 23.33 (1) (gm) of the statutes is created to read:23.33 (1) (gm) “Hybrid trail” means an all-terrain vehicle trail and all-terrain vehicle route combination that allows all-terrain vehicles and motor vehicles to use the same linear surface and the combination is used to connect one all-terrain vehicle trail to another all-terrain vehicle trail or services.AB221,2Section 2. 23.33 (2) (bm) of the statutes is created to read:23.33 (2) (bm) Vehicles registered out-of-state. 1. A vehicle registered outside of this state shall be considered an all-terrain vehicle or utility terrain vehicle, regardless of the vehicle type specified on the out-of-state registration for the vehicle, if the vehicle manufacturer’s certificate of origin designates the vehicle as an all-terrain vehicle or utility terrain vehicle. Subject to subd. 2., an all-terrain vehicle or utility terrain vehicle registered outside of this state shall be subject to the requirements of this section and chs. 340 to 351 that are applicable to all-terrain vehicles or utility terrain vehicles.2. If a vehicle registered outside of this state is considered an all-terrain vehicle or utility terrain vehicle under subd. 1., but does not meet the definition of an all-terrain vehicle under sub. (1) (b) or a utility terrain vehicle under sub. (1) (ng), the department or its agents may not issue a nonresident trail pass under sub. (2j) for the vehicle and, notwithstanding any reciprocal agreement under s. 341.409 or 341.41, no person may operate the vehicle upon any highway, all-terrain vehicle route, or all-terrain vehicle trail.AB221,3Section 3. 23.33 (2j) (a) 1. of the statutes is amended to read:23.33 (2j) (a) 1. “Public all-terrain vehicle corridor” means an all-terrain vehicle trail, all-terrain vehicle route, hybrid trail, or other established all-terrain vehicle corridor that is open to the public but does not include an all-terrain vehicle route.AB221,4Section 4. 340.01 (73e) of the statutes is created to read:340.01 (73e) “Utility terrain vehicle” has the meaning given in s. 23.33 (1) (ng).AB221,5Section 5. 340.01 (74) of the statutes is amended to read:340.01 (74) “Vehicle” means every device in, upon, or by which any person or property is or may be transported or drawn upon a highway, except railroad trains. A snowmobile, an all-terrain vehicle, a utility terrain vehicle, a personal delivery device, an electric scooter, and an electric personal assistive mobility device shall not be considered a vehicle except for purposes made specifically applicable by statute. Down Down /2025/related/enrolled/ab221 true enrolledbills /2025/related/enrolled/ab221 enrolledbills/2025/REG/AB221 enrolledbills/2025/REG/AB221 section true Menu»2025»Related Documents»Enrolled Legislation»AB221: Text as Enrolled × Details for PDF view Link (Permanent link) Bookmark this location View toggle Go to top of document Search in this chapter Search in this section Search in this agency Search in this chapter group Search in this chapter Search in this section Cross references for section Acts affecting this section References to this 1970 Statutes Annotations Appellate Court Citations Administrative Code Index Reference lines Clear highlighting